Arkansas, session 2025, HB1040.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as "The Water in Line Act of
2025".

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Arkansas has a longstanding law prohibiting electioneering
within one hundred feet (100') of a polling place;
(2) Act 728 of 2021 applies to people who are not engaging in
electioneering activities;
(3) In certain circumstances, Act 728 of 2021 makes it a
criminal offense for a volunteer to bring water or food to someone waiting in
line to vote, a family member to accompany an elderly or disabled voter, and
a child to join his or her parent in line to vote; and
(4) The repeal of Act 728 of 2021 would have no effect on Arkansas's
*SSS012*
01-23-2025 09:39:19 SSS012

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 H1/23/25 HB1040
electioneering prohibition, which would remain in place.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 7-1-103(a)(24), concerning miscellaneous
misdemeanor offenses relating to elections, is repealed.
(24) A person shall not enter or remain in an area within one
hundred feet (100′) of the primary exterior entrance to a building where
voting is taking place except for a person entering or leaving a building
where voting is taking place for lawful purposes.

/s/A. Collins


























01-23-2025 09:39:19 SSS012